Utah statutes.
16-10a-1503.   Application for authority to transact business.

(1)  A foreign corporation may apply for authority to transact business in this state by delivering to the division for filing an application for authority to transact business setting forth:

(a)  its corporate name and its assumed name, if any;

(b)  the name of the state or country under whose law it is incorporated;

(c)  its date of incorporation and period of its corporate duration;

(d)  the street address of its principal office;

(e)  the information required by Subsection 16-17-203(1);

(f)  the names and usual business addresses of its current directors and officers;

(g)  the date it commenced or expects to commence transacting business in this state; and

(h)  any additional information the division may determine is necessary or appropriate to determine whether the application for authority to transact business should be filed.

(2)  The foreign corporation shall deliver with the completed application for authority to transact business a certificate of existence, or a document of similar import, duly authorized by the lieutenant governor or other official having custody of corporate records in the state or country under whose law it is incorporated.  The certificate of existence shall be dated within 90 days before the day on which the application for authority to transact business by the division is filed.

(3) (a)  The division may permit a tribal corporation to apply for authority to transact business in this state in the same manner as a foreign corporation incorporated in another state.

(b)  If a tribal corporation elects to apply for authority to transact business in this state, for purposes of this chapter, the tribal corporation shall be treated in the same manner as a foreign corporation incorporated under the laws of another state.



Amended by Chapter 43, 2010 General Session

